Utah statutes.
58-1-507.   Cosmetic medical procedure -- Truth in advertising.

Beginning July 1, 2013, a facility that performs a cosmetic medical procedure as defined in Section 58-67-102 may not advertise or hold itself out to the public as a "medical spa," "medical facility," or "medical clinic" unless the facility has an individual on the premises while a cosmetic medical procedure is performed who is licensed under:

(1)  Chapter 31b, Nurse Practices Act, as an advanced practice registered nurse, practicing as a nurse practitioner;

(2)  Chapter 67, Utah Medical Practice Act; or

(3)  Chapter 68, Utah Osteopathic Medical Practice Act.



Enacted by Chapter 362, 2012 General Session

